Missouri, session 2026, HB1612.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 171, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 171.022, to read as follows:
171.022. 1. As used in this section, "Ten Commandments" means the following
text:
"The Ten Commandments
I AM the LORD thy God.
Thou shalt have no other gods before me.
Thou shalt not make to thyself any graven images.
Thou shalt not take the Name of the Lord thy God in vain.
Remember the Sabbath day, to keep it holy.
Honor thy father and thy mother, that thy days may be long upon the land which
the Lord thy God giveth thee.
Thou shalt not kill.
Thou shalt not commit adultery.
Thou shalt not steal.
Thou shalt not bear false witness against thy neighbor.
Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's house, thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's
wife, nor his manservant, nor his maidservant, nor his cattle, nor anything that is thy
neighbor's.".
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1612 2
2. Beginning on January 1, 2027, each school district's school board and charter
school's governing board shall display the Ten Commandments in each building and
classroom under the school board's or governing board's jurisdiction, subject to at least
the following requirements:
(1) The nature of such display shall be determined by each school board and
governing board;
(2) Such display shall be composed of, at a minimum, a poster or framed
document that is at least eleven inches by fourteen inches; and
(3) The text of the Ten Commandments shall be the central focus of the poster or
framed document and shall be printed in a large, easily readable font.
3. (1) A school board or governing board may spend the board's moneys or
donated moneys to purchase the displays.
(2) A school board or governing board may accept donated displays.
(3) This section shall not be construed to require a school board or governing
board to spend the board's moneys to purchase displays.
4. The state board of education may promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after the effective date of this section shall be invalid
and void.
✔